Illinois, session 104th, HB4459.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Local 5Government Open Burn Permit Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:7    "Home rule unit" means a county or municipality that is a 8home rule unit as provided in Section 6 of Article VII of the 9Illinois Constitution.10    "Local government open burn permit" means a permit issued 11under this Act or under an ordinance or resolution authorized 12by this Act for open burning, including permits for:13        (1) fire fighter training or fire extinguisher 14    training;15        (2) landscape waste burning using an air curtain 16    destructor;17        (3) prairie and economical landscape burns; and18        (4) disaster debris open burning.19    "Municipality" means a city, village, or incorporated 20town.21    "No burn day" means a day upon which open burning is 22restricted by the State or a fire protection district, county, 23municipality, the Illinois Environmental Protection Agency, or   HB4459- 2 -LRB104 16945 BDA 30359 b1the Illinois Pollution Control Board due to safety concerns 2determined by the restricting body.3    "Open burning" has the meaning given in Section 3.300 of 4the Environmental Protection Act. 5    Section 10. Local government ordinances; rules. 6    (a) Any county or municipality may adopt ordinances or 7resolutions establishing requirements for local government 8open burn permits issued by it under this Act and may enter 9into intergovernmental agreements to implement this Act.10    (b) The Environmental Protection Agency may propose and 11the Pollution Control Board may adopt any rules necessary to 12implement and administer this Act. 13    Section 15. Local government open burn permits. 14    (a) Any person seeking to perform an open burn in a 15municipality shall obtain a local government open burn permit 16under this Act from the municipality where the burn is taking 17place in addition to any applicable open burn permit from the 18Illinois Environmental Protection Agency under the 19Environmental Protection Act and rules adopted under that Act.20    (b) Any person seeking to perform an open burn in a place 21that is not in a municipality shall obtain a local government 22open burn permit under this Act from the county where the burn 23is taking place in addition to any applicable open burn permit 24from the Illinois Environmental Protection Agency under the   HB4459- 3 -LRB104 16945 BDA 30359 b1Environmental Protection Act and rules adopted under that Act. 2    Section 20. Online form for local government open burn 3permits. Every county and municipality shall create an online 4publicly accessible platform that contains the following 5information:6        (1) a form that may be used to apply to the county or 7    municipality for a local government open burn permit;8        (2) a list of no burn days in the county or 9    municipality; and10        (3) a reporting mechanism for the public to submit 11    photos, videos, and complaints of open burns that are 12    without proper permits or that are in violation of 13    applicable laws, rules, ordinances, or resolutions. 14    Section 25. Local government open burn permit fees. A 15municipality or county may, by ordinance or resolution, impose 16a local government open burn permit fee in the amount of up to 17$5 for each local government open burn permit it issues. 18Proceeds from the local government open burn permit fee shall 19be used for fire protection purposes. 20    Section 30. Penalties and enforcement.21    (a) Any person who, without a local government open burn 22permit issued under this Act, conducts an open burn on a day 23that is not a no burn day is liable for a civil penalty of up   HB4459- 4 -LRB104 16945 BDA 30359 b1to $100,000.2    (b) Any person who, without a local government open burn 3permit issued under this Act, conducts an open burn on a day 4that is a no burn day is liable for a civil penalty of up to 5$500,000.6    (c) The State's Attorney of the county where the violation 7occurs or the Attorney General shall enforce this Act. An 8attorney of a municipality may enforce ordinances or 9resolutions adopted under Section 10 of this Act. Upon a 10proper showing that a violation of this Act or an ordinance or 11resolution adopted under Section 10 of this Act has occurred 12or is about to occur, the court may issue a permanent or 13preliminary injunction or any other equitable remedy the court 14deems appropriate. 15    Section 35. Home rule. A home rule unit may not regulate 16open burning in a manner inconsistent with this Act. This 17Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of 18Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent 19exercise by home rule units of powers and functions exercised 20by the State. 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.